Maryland, session 2025, SB0787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–26.1.
(a) In this section, “reserve study” means a study of the reserves required for
future major repairs and replacement of the common elements of a cooperative housing
corporation that:
(1) Identifies each structural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing
component of the common elements and any other components that are the responsibility
of the cooperative housing corporation [to repair and replace] WITH A REPAIR OR
REPLACEMENT COST THAT EXCEEDS $10,000;
(2) States the normal useful life and the estimated remaining useful life of
each identified component;
(3) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each identified
component; and
(4) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to accomplish
any identified future repair or replacement.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION THAT:
(1) CONSISTS OF ANY BUILDING CONTAINING FOUR OR MORE
STORIES USED FOR HABITATION BY RESIDENTS; OR
(2) CONTAINS FOUR OR MORE SINGLE–FAMILY UNITS.
[(b)] (C) (1) This subsection applies only to a cooperative housing corporation
established in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the cooperative housing corporation shall have
an independent reserve study completed not less than 30 calendar days before the first

SENATE BILL 787 3
meeting of the cooperative housing corporation at which the members other than the owner
have a majority of votes in the cooperative housing corporation.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection, which shall be updated at least every [5] 10 years thereafter.
[(c)] (D) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a cooperative housing
corporation established in Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every [5] 10 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study
at least every [5] 10 years thereafter.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a cooperative housing corporation
established in Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every [5] 10 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study
at least every [5] 10 years thereafter.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies to a cooperative housing corporation
established in any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before
October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every [5] 10 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study
at least every [5] 10 years thereafter.

SENATE BILL 787
[(d)] (E) Each reserve study required under this section shall:
(1) Be prepared by a person who:
(i) Has prepared at least 30 reserve studies within the prior 3
calendar years;
(ii) Has participated in the preparation of at least 30 reserve studies
within the prior 3 calendar years while employed by a firm that prepares reserve studies;
(iii) Holds a current license from the State Board of Architects or the
State Board for Professional Engineers; [or]
(iv) Is currently designated as a reserve specialist by the Community
Association Institute or as a professional reserve analyst by the Association of Professional
Reserve Analysts; OR
(V) HOLDS A CURRENT LICENSE FROM:
1. THE STATE BOARD OF ELECTRICIANS;
2. THE STATE BOARD OF PLUMBERS; OR
3. THE MARYLAND HOME IMPROVEMENT COMMISSION;
(2) Be available for inspection and copying by any unit owner;
(3) Be reviewed by the governing body of the cooperative housing
corporation in connection with the preparation of the annual proposed budget; and
(4) Be summarized for submission with the annual proposed budget to the
unit owners.
[(e)] (F) To the extent that a reserve study conducted in accordance with this
section indicates a need to budget for reserves, the budget shall include:
(1) For the capital components, the current estimated:
(i) Replacement cost IF THE ESTIMATED REPLACEMENT COST IS
GREATER THAN $10,000 AS DETERMINED BY THE MOST RECENT RESERVE STUDY;
(ii) Remaining life; and
(iii) Useful life;

SENATE BILL 787 5
(2) The amount of accumulated cash reserves set aside for the repair,
replacement, or restoration of capital components as of the beginning of the fiscal year in
which the reserve study is conducted and the amount of the expected contribution to the
reserve fund for the fiscal year;
(3) A statement describing the procedures used for estimation and
accumulation of cash reserves in accordance with this section; and
(4) A statement of the amount of reserves recommended in the study and
the amount of current cash for replacement reserves.
[(f)] (G) (1) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
governing body of a cooperative housing corporation shall provide funds to the reserve in
accordance with the most recent reserve study and shall review the reserve study annually
for accuracy.
(ii) If the most recent reserve study was an initial reserve study, the
governing body shall, within [3] 10 fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the initial
reserve study was completed, attain the annual reserve funding level recommended in the
initial reserve study.
(2) The governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has the
authority to increase an assessment levied to cover the reserve funding amount required
under this section, notwithstanding any provision of the articles of incorporation, bylaws,
or proprietary lease restricting assessment increases or capping the assessment that may
be levied in a fiscal year.
Article – Real Property
11–109.2.
(a) The council of unit owners shall cause to be prepared and submitted to the
unit owners an annual proposed budget at least 30 days before its adoption.
(b) The annual budget shall provide for at least the following items:
(1) Income;
(2) Administration;
(3) Maintenance;
(4) Utilities;
(5) General expenses;
(6) Reserves; and

SENATE BILL 787
(7) Capital items.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the reserves provided for in
the annual budget under subsection (b) of this section for a residential condominium shall
be the funding amount recommended in the most recent reserve study completed under §
11–109.4 of this title.
(2) If the most recent reserve study was an initial reserve study, the
governing body shall, within [3] 10 fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the initial
reserve study was completed, attain the annual reserve funding level recommended in the
initial reserve study.
11–109.4.
(a) In this section, “reserve study” means a study of the reserves required for
future major repairs and replacement of the common elements of a condominium that:
(1) Identifies each structural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing
component of the common elements and any other components that are the responsibility
of the council of unit owners to repair and replace WITH A REPAIR OR REPLACEMENT
COST THAT EXCEEDS $10,000;
(2) States the normal useful life and the estimated remaining useful life of
each identified component;
(3) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each identified
component; and
(4) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to accomplish
any identified future repair or replacement.
(b) This section applies only to a residential condominium THAT:
(1) CONSISTS OF ANY BUILDING CONTAINING FOUR OR MORE
STORIES USED FOR HABITATION BY RESIDENTS; OR
(2) CONTAINS FOUR OR MORE SINGLE–FAMILY UNITS.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to a condominium established in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or

SENATE BILL 787 7
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the condominium shall have an independent
reserve study completed not less than 30 calendar days before the meeting of the council of
unit owners required under § 11–109(c)(16) of this title.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection and at least every [5] 10 years thereafter.
(d) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in
Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every [5]
10 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study at least every [5] 10
years thereafter.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in
Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every [5]
10 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study at least every [5] 10
years thereafter.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in any
county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every [5]
10 years thereafter.

SENATE BILL 787
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study at least every [5] 10
years thereafter.
(e) Each reserve study required under this section shall:
(1) Be prepared by a person who:
(i) Has prepared at least 30 reserve studies within the prior 3
calendar years;
(ii) Has participated in the preparation of at least 30 reserve studies
within the prior 3 calendar years while employed by a firm that prepares reserve studies;
(iii) Holds a current license from the State Board of Architects or the
State Board for Professional Engineers; [or]
(iv) Is currently designated as a reserve specialist by the Community
Association Institute or as a professional reserve analyst by the Association of Professional
Reserve Analysts; OR
(V) HOLDS A CURRENT LICENSE FROM:
1. THE STATE BOARD OF ELECTRICIANS;
2. THE STATE BOARD OF PLUMBERS; OR
3. THE MARYLAND HOME IMPROVEMENT COMMISSION;
(2) Be available for inspection and copying by any unit owner;
(3) Be reviewed by the governing body of the condominium in connection
with the preparation of the annual proposed budget; and
(4) Be summarized for submission with the annual proposed budget to the
unit owners.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.